kjh.twol
!! NOTE: some words contain ь or ъ, probably loan words or something, I assume
!!       these characters should be skipped when checking for vowel harmony and
!!       assimilation, but I may be wrong

Alphabet
  ! Cyrillic Alphabet
  А Б В Г Ғ Д Е Ё Ж З И Й І К Л М Н Ң О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ӌ Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  	
  а б в г ғ д е ё ж з и й і к л м н ң о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ӌ ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 
  %{а%}:а %{а%}:е
  %{ы%}:і %{ы%}:ы %{ы%}:0 %{ы%}:а %{ы%}:е
  а:а
  е:е
  ы:ы ы:а
  у:у у:а
  о:о о:а
  и:и и:е
  і:і і:е
  ӧ:ӧ ӧ:е
  ӱ:ӱ ӱ:е
  %{л%}:л %{л%}:н %{л%}:т
  %{d%}:д %{d%}:н %{d%}:т
  %{с%}:з %{с%}:с
  %{з%}:з %{з%}:0
  %{т%}:н %{т%}:т
  %{д%}:д %{д%}:т 
  %{н%}:н %{н%}:0 
  %{х%}:ғ %{х%}:г %{х%}:х %{х%}:к %{х%}:0
  %{px3%}:0
  %{acc%}:0
  %{loc%}:0
  %{all%}:0
  %{abl%}:0
  %{dat%}:0
  %>:0 %>:> ! change rule to > if you wanna see morpheme boundaries
;

!==================
Sets
!==================
! not sure where ь and ъ should go

Cns = б в г ғ д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ӌ ш щ ъ ь;
VoicedCns = б в г ғ д ж з й л м н ң р ӌ ;
UnvoicedCns = к п с т ф х ч ш щ ц ъ ь ;
Nasals = м н ң ;
BCns = б л р ё н м ;
GCns = г ғ ң ;
ArchiCns = %{л%} %{з%} %{с%} %{т%} %{д%} %{н%} %{х%} %{d%};

Vowels = а е ё и і о ӧ у ӱ ы ю я ;
FrontVowels = е и і ӧ ӱ ;
BackVowels = а ы у о ё ю я ;
ArchiVowls = %{а%} %{ы%} ;

Markers = %{px3%} %{acc%} %{loc%} %{all%} %{dat%} ;

!==================
Definitions
!==================

StemBackVowel = BackVowels: [ Markers: | ArchiVowls: | ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ ;

!==================
Rules
!==================

"Assimilation {л} -> л when following a vowel or a voiced consonant, except nasals"
%{л%}:л <=> [ Vowels: | VoicedCns: ] [ь:]* %>: _ ;
        except
            Nasals: [ь:]* %>: _ ;

"Assimilation {л} -> н when following nasals"
%{л%}:н <=> Nasals: [ь:]* %>: _ ;

"Assimilation {d} -> д when following a vowel or a voiced consonant, except nasals"
%{d%}:д <=> [ Vowels: | VoicedCns: ] [ь:]* %>: _ ;
        except
            Nasals: [ь:]* %>: _ ;
            %{px3%}: %>: _ %{а%}: ң %{abl%}: ;

"Assimilation {d} -> н when following nasals"
%{d%}:н <=> Nasals: [ь:]* %>: _ ;

"{d} -> н when in ablative and following 3rd person possessive"
%{d%}:н <=> %{px3%}: %>: _ %{а%}: ң %{abl%}: ;

"{з} -> 0 when following consonants"
%{з%}:0 <=> Cns: %>: _ ;

"Assimilation {т} -> т when following an unvoiced consonant"
%{т%}:т <=> UnvoicedCns: [ ь: | ArchiCns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Assimilation {д} -> т when following an unvoiced consonant"
%{д%}:т <=> UnvoicedCns: [ ь: | ArchiCns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Assimilation {с} -> с when following an unvoiced consonant"
%{с%}:с <=> UnvoicedCns: [ ь: | ArchiCns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {а}"
%{а%}:а <=> StemBackVowel _ ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {ы}"
%{ы%}:ы <=> StemBackVowel _ ;
        except
            Vowels: %>: _ ;
            %{px3%}: %>: %{т%}: _ %{acc%}: ;
            _ %>: %{х%}:0 :а ;
            _ %>: %{х%}:0 :е ;


"{ы} -> 0 when following vowels"
%{ы%}:0 <=> Vowels: %>: _ ;
        except
            _ %>: %{х%}:0 :а ;
            _ %>: %{х%}:0 :е ;

"Assimilation, Vowel Harmony {х} -> г/ғ after most voiced consonants"
%{х%}:Cx <=> [б | л | р | й | н | м] %>: _ :Vx ;
             where Vx in (а е)
                   Cx in (ғ г)
             matched ;

"Assimilation, Vowel Harmony {х} -> г/ғ after long vowels"
%{х%}:Cx <=> Vowels: Vowels: %>: _ :Vx;
             where Vx in (а е)
                   Cx in (ғ г)
             matched ;

"Elision of {х} b/w short vowels and after г/ң/ғ"
%{х%}:0 <=> \:Vowels :Vowels %>: _ ;
            [г | ң | ғ] %>: _ ;

"Stem vowel assimilation with null {x}"
Vx:Vy <=> _ %>: %{х%}:0 :Vy ;
          where Vx in (ы у о и і ӧ ӱ)
                Vy in (а а а е е е е)
          matched ;

"Stem {ы} assimilation with null {x}"
%{ы%}:а <=> _ %>: %{х%}:0 :а ;

"Stem {ы} assimilation with null {x}"
%{ы%}:е <=> _ %>: %{х%}:0 :е ;

"Assimilation, Vowel Harmony {х} -> х/к after unvoiced consonants"
%{х%}:Cx <=> [Cns - [б | л | р | й | н | м | г | ң | ғ] ] %>: _ :Vx ;
             where Vx in (а е)
                   Cx in (х к)
             matched ;

! _TODO_ this is kinda jank, is there a better way to do this?
"{ы} -> 0  when in accusitive following 3rd person possessive"
%{ы%}:0 <=> %{px3%}: %>: %{т%}: _ %{acc%}: ;

! _TODO_ same with this one
"{н} -> н  when in locative following 3rd person possessive"
%{н%}:н <=> %{px3%}: %>: _ %{д%}: %{а%}: %{loc%}: ;

! _TODO_ and this one
"{н} -> н  when in allative following 3rd person possessive"
%{н%}:н <=> %{px3%}: %>: _ %{с%}: %{а%}: р %{all%}: ;

"{А} -> а"
%{A%}:а <=> _ ;

"{Е} -> е"
%{Е%}:е <=> _ ;

"Remove morpheme boundaries"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"remove 3rd person possessive marker"
%{px3%}:0 <=> _ ;

"remove accusitive marker"
%{acc%}:0 <=> _ ;

"remove locative marker"
%{loc%}:0 <=> _ ;

"remove lative marker"
%{all%}:0 <=> _ ;

"remove ablative marker"
%{abl%}:0 <=> _ ;

"remove dative marker"
%{dat%}:0 <=> _ ;
